Arkansas, session 2025, SB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106, as amended by SB227 of 2025, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(j)(1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, if a circuit
court finds that a governing body or a member of a governing body violated
this section concerning the issuance of bonds, the circuit court may only
invalidate the action by the governing body authorizing the issuance of bonds
within thirty (30) days of the date the action occurred.
(2) If a circuit court makes a finding described under
subdivision (j)(1) of this section more than thirty (30) days after the
action by the governing body authorizing the issuance of the bonds:
(A) The governing body shall cure the violation within
thirty (30) days after the finding of the circuit court by:
(i) Providing notice of the violation in compliance
with subsection (b) of this section;
(ii) Disclosing the violation at a public meeting;
and
*LGL195*
04-09-2025 13:21:51 LGL195

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/9/25 SB614
(iii) Authorizing the action in question at the
public meeting in compliance with subdivision (a)(5) of this section; or
(B)(i) The circuit court shall impose a civil penalty of
one thousand dollars ($1,000) on each individual member of the governing
body, up to the entire membership of the governing body, who the circuit
court finds committed or was otherwise responsible for the violation.
(ii) The civil penalty under subdivision
(j)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall:
(a) Be paid to the claimant asserting the
claim in circuit court within thirty (30) days of the finding of the circuit
court under subdivision (j)(1) of this section; and
(b) Not be satisfied by public funds.
(3) The remedies under subdivision (j)(2) of this section are
supplemental to all other remedies available under this chapter within the
applicable statute of limitations.
(4) As used in this subsection, "bonds" means bonds and other
debt-related instruments, including without limitation a short-term financing
obligation, under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 78.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Contingency.
(a) Section 1 of this act shall become effective only if SB227 of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly is enacted by the General Assembly and becomes
an act.
(b) If SB227 of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly does not become an
act, Section 1 of this act shall not become effective.

/s/C. Tucker









04-09-2025 13:21:51 LGL195